New Jersey, session 222, S2391.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9) is amended to read as follows: 9.    a. A restricted, nonlapsing, revolving Workforce Development Partnership Fund, to be managed and invested by the State Treasurer, is hereby established to: provide employment and training services to qualified displaced, disadvantaged and employed workers by means of training grants or customized training services; provide for the other costs indicated in subsection a. of section 4 of [this act] P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-4); support the activities of the New Jersey State Commission on Cancer Research established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.6 (C.52:9U-1 et seq.); and facilitate the provision of education and training to youth by means of grants provided by the Youth Transitions to Work Partnership pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1993, c.268 (C.34:15E-1 et al.).  All appropriations to the fund, all interest accumulated on balances in the fund and all cash received for the fund from any other source shall be used solely for the purposes specifically delineated by this act. b.    During any fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2001, of the total revenues dedicated to the program during any one fiscal year: 25% shall be deposited in an account of the Workforce Development Partnership Fund reserved to provide employment and training services for qualified displaced workers; 6% shall be deposited in an account of the Workforce Development Partnership Fund reserved to provide employment and training services for qualified disadvantaged workers; [45%] 44% shall be deposited in an account of the Workforce Development Partnership Fund reserved for and appropriated to the Office of Customized Training; 3% shall be deposited in an account of the Workforce Development Partnership Fund reserved for occupational safety and health training; 5% shall be deposited in an account of the Workforce Development Partnership Fund reserved for the Youth Transitions to Work Partnership created pursuant to P.L.1993, c.268 (C.34:15E-1 et seq.); 1% shall be deposited in an account of the New Jersey State Commission on Cancer Research established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.6 (C.52:9U-1 et seq.); 10% shall be deposited in an account of the Workforce Development Partnership Fund reserved for administrative costs as defined in section 3 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-3); 0.5% shall be deposited in an account of the Workforce Development Partnership Fund reserved for the State Employment and Training Commission to design criteria and conduct an annual evaluation of the program; and 5.5% shall be deposited in an account of the Workforce Development Partnership Fund to be used, at the discretion of the commissioner, for any of the purposes indicated in subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-4). c.     Beginning January 1, 1995, through June 30, 2002, the balance in the fund as of the previous December 31, as determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, shall not exceed 1.5 times the amount of contributions deposited for the calendar year then ended.  If the balance exceeds this amount, the excess shall be deposited into the unemployment compensation fund within seven business days of the date that the determination is made. d.    Beginning July 1, 2002, and for any subsequent fiscal year, if the unexpended cash balance in any of the accounts indicated in subsection b. of this section, less any amount awarded in grants but not yet disbursed from the account, is determined to exceed 20% of the amount of contributions collected for deposit in the account pursuant to this subsection during the fiscal year then ended, the excess shall be regarded as an unemployment compensation contribution and deposited into the unemployment compensation fund within seven business days of the date that the determination is made. (cf: P.L.2019, c.419, s.1) 2.    Section 5 of P.L.1982, c.40 (C.54:40A-37.1) is amended to read as follows: [The sum of $1,000,000.00 of the tax collected pursuant to section 301 of P.L.1948, c.65 (C.54:40A-8),] Receipts collected from all fees for "Conquer Cancer" license plates pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1997, c.92 (C.39:3-27.90) shall be deposited by the State Treasurer in a special account to be known as the Cancer Research Fund [, except that for Fiscal Year 1983 only $500,000.00 shall be deposited in that account].  Moneys in the Cancer Research Fund shall be annually appropriated toward the funding of the New Jersey State Commission on Cancer Research established pursuant to P.L.1983, c.6 (C.52:9U-1 et seq.), or to projects authorized and approved by the commission. (cf: P.L.1990, c.39, s.18) 3.    Section 8 of P.L.1983, c.6 (C.52:9U-8) is repealed. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.